California, session 20252026, SB1023.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1342.74 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1342.74. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1342.71, a health care service plan shall not subject antiretroviral drugs drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are medically necessary for the prevention of AIDS/HIV, HIV/AIDS, including preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis, to prior authorization or step therapy, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, drug device, or drug product for the prevention of AIDS/HIV, HIV/AIDS, this section does not require a health care service plan to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization or step therapy, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization or step therapy.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a health care service plan shall not prohibit, or permit a delegated pharmacy benefit manager to prohibit, a pharmacy provider from dispensing preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis.(c) A health care service plan shall cover preexposure prophylaxis and or postexposure prophylaxis that has been furnished by a pharmacist, as authorized in Sections 4052.02 and 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code, including the pharmacist’s services and related testing ordered by the pharmacist. A health care service plan shall pay or reimburse, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, for the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy or a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the health care service plan has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(d) This section does not require a health care service plan to cover preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis by a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy, unless in the case of a medical emergency or if the health care service plan has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), a health care service plan contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, that covers non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as a medical benefit shall also include those non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as an outpatient prescription drug benefit.(f) (1) This section does not apply to a specialized health care service plan contract that covers only dental, mental health, or vision benefits, or a Medicare supplement contract.(2) This section applies regardless of whether or not an antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product is self-administered.(e)(3) This section shall does not apply to Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14590) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to the extent that the services described in this section are excluded from coverage under the contract between the Medi-Cal managed care plans and the State Department of Health Care Services.SEC. 2. Section 10123.1933 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10123.1933. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10123.201, a health insurer shall not subject antiretroviral drugs drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are medically necessary for the prevention of AIDS/HIV, HIV/AIDS, including preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis, to prior authorization or step therapy, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, drug device, or drug product for the prevention of AIDS/HIV, HIV/AIDS, this section does not require a health insurer to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization or step therapy, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization or step therapy.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a health insurer shall not prohibit, or permit a contracted pharmacy benefit manager to prohibit, a pharmacist from dispensing preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis.(c) A health insurer shall cover preexposure prophylaxis and or postexposure prophylaxis that has been furnished by a pharmacist, as authorized in Sections 4052.02 and 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code, including the pharmacist’s services and related testing ordered by the pharmacist. A health insurer shall pay or reimburse, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, for the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy or a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the health insurer has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, that covers non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as a medical benefit shall also include those non-self-administered antiretroviral drugs, drug devices, or drug products that are approved by the FDA for the prevention of HIV/AIDS as an outpatient prescription drug benefit.(e) (1) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that covers only dental, mental health, or vision benefits, or a Medicare supplement contract.(2) This section applies regardless of whether or not an antiretroviral drug, drug device, or drug product is self-administered.(f) The department and commissioner may exercise the authority provided by this code and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement and enforce this section. If the commissioner assesses an administrative penalty for a violation, any hearing that is requested by the insurer may be conducted by an administrative law judge of the administrative hearing bureau of the department under the formal procedure of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision does not impair or restrict the commissioner’s authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 753 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:753.(a)It is unlawful for an insurance agent or broker, or an insurance solicitor employed thereby, to receive a financial benefit from an automobile repair facility or other form of direct or indirect consideration from a person for referring insureds to that person or that person’s designee for vehicle repairs covered under the automobile comprehensive coverage, property damage coverage, or automobile collision coverage, of an insurance policy issued through the insurance agent or broker or by an insurer represented by the insurance agent.(b)Subdivision (a) applies with respect to commercial and noncommercial policies of automobile insurance.(c)For purposes of this section, “financial benefit” means the receiving of a commission or gratuity, discount on repair costs, free repairs, or employment by a repair facility.